Nevada, session 83, AB457.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6.5. 1. During the 2025-2026 interim, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Revenue shall conduct a study on:
(a) The advisability and feasibility of, and estimated impact to
state revenue that would result from, treating as a single entity for
the purposes of the commerce tax imposed by chapter 363C of NRS:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(1) A business entity primarily engaged in the business of
renting real property located in this State to other persons, which has
more than 50 percent of the value of the ownership interest of the
business entity owned or controlled, directly or constructively
through related interests, by common owners.
(2) A limited liability company, and any series thereof,
primarily engaged in the business of renting real property located in
this State to other persons.
(3) Any other type or form of entity engaged primarily in the
business of renting real property located in this State to other
persons which the Committee determines is advisable to study.
(b) The advisability and feasibility of, and estimated impact to
state and local revenue that would result from, imposing a tax on the
sale or transfer of a controlling interest in an entity which owns an
interest in real property in this State and the manner in which such a
tax should be administered, including, without limitation, the
manner in which a change in the controlling interest in an entity
which possesses an interest in real property should be reported and
the tax remitted.
2. On or before January 1, 2027, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Revenue shall submit a report of the results of the
study, including, without limitation, any recommendations for
legislation, to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the 84th Session of the Nevada Legislature.
Sec. 7. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)